Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-270
Unlawful distribution; liability.

(a) A limited partner who receives a distribution in violation of section 67-269 and who knew at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated such section shall be liable to the limited partnership for the amount of the distribution. A limited partner who receives a distribution in violation of such section and who did not know at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated such section shall not be liable for the amount of the distribution. Subject to subsection (b) of this section, this subsection shall not affect any obligation or liability of a limited partner under a partnership agreement or other applicable law for the amount of a distribution.

(b) Unless otherwise agreed, a limited partner who receives a distribution from a limited partnership shall have no liability under the Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act or other applicable law for the amount of the distribution after the expiration of three years from the date of the distribution.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 38;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 43.